Utah statutes.
17-18a-202.   County attorney powers and functions.

(1)  Except within a county that is located in a prosecution district, the county attorney:

(a)  is a public prosecutor for the county; and

(b)  shall perform each public prosecutor and civil counsel duty in accordance with this chapter or as otherwise required by law.

(2)  In a county that is located within a prosecution district, the county attorney:

(a)  is the civil counsel for the county; and

(b)  shall perform each civil counsel duty in the county or prosecution district in accordance with this chapter or as otherwise required by law.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

